Florida, session 2026, HB1163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (13) is added to section 627.944,
Florida Statutes, to read:
627.944 Risk retention groups not certificated in this
state.—Risk retention groups certificated or licensed in states
other than this state and seeking to do business as a risk
retention group in this state must observe and abide by the laws
of this state as follows:
(13) AUTHORIZATION.—A risk retention group registered to
do business in this state pursuant to this section is an
insurance company authorized to do business in this state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1163-00